Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Oil Pipeline Reclamation Act:

(1) Oil means
petroleum of any kind or in any form, including crude oil or any fraction
of crude oil;

(2) Pipeline carrier means a person that engages in owning, operating,
or managing a pipeline or part of a pipeline for the transportation of oil
but does not include an entity under the jurisdiction of the Nebraska Oil
and Gas Conservation Commission for in-field flow-lines and gathering lines;

(3) Reclamation
means restoration of the areas through which a pipeline is constructed as
close as reasonably practicable to the condition, contour, and vegetation
that existed prior to construction; and

(4) Reclamation costs include, but are not
limited to, the costs of restoration of real and personal property, the costs
of restoration of natural resources, the costs of rehabilitation of habitat
or wildlife, and the costs of revegetation.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 2.
May 27, 2011